Hawaii statutes.
§448E-5 Minimum requirements. (a) Except
as otherwise provided in subsection (b), an applicant shall possess the
following minimum qualifications:

(1) Journey worker electrician: To be eligible for
the journey worker electrician examination, an applicant shall be at least
eighteen years of age and shall provide satisfactory evidence of experience in
residential or commercial wiring of at least five years full-time or its
equivalent, but not less than ten thousand hours, in the trade under the supervision
of a journey worker or supervising electrician;

(2) Journey worker specialty electrician: To be
eligible for the journey worker specialty electrician examination, an applicant
shall be at least eighteen years of age and shall provide satisfactory evidence
of at least five years' experience in the trade;

(3) Supervising electrician: To be eligible for the
supervising electrician examination, an applicant shall have been registered
with the board as a journey worker electrician for at least a period of four
years or shall have equivalent experience in the trade;

(4) Supervising specialty electrician: To be
eligible for the supervising specialty electrician examination, an applicant
shall have been registered with the board as a journey worker specialty
electrician for at least a period of four years or shall have equivalent
experience in the trade;

(5) Journey worker plumber: To be eligible for the
journey worker plumber examination, an applicant shall provide satisfactory
evidence of experience of at least five years' full-time or its equivalent, but
not less than ten thousand hours, as a journey worker's or master plumber's
helper;

(6) Master plumber: To be eligible for the master
plumber examination, an applicant shall have been registered with the board as
a journey worker plumber for at least two years or shall have equivalent
experience in the trade;

(7) Maintenance electrician: To be eligible for the
maintenance electrician examination, an applicant shall be not less than
eighteen years of age and shall provide satisfactory evidence of at least one
year of experience in performing electrical maintenance work or two years of
schooling in the electrical trade;

(8) Journey worker industrial electrician: To be
eligible for the journey worker industrial electrician examination, an
applicant shall be at least eighteen years of age and shall provide
satisfactory evidence of experience in industrial electrical work of at least
five years full-time or its equivalent, but not less than ten thousand hours;

(9) Supervising industrial electrician: To be
eligible for the supervising industrial electrician examination, an applicant
shall have been registered with the board as a journey worker industrial
electrician for a period of at least four years or shall have equivalent
experience in the trade.

(b) Effective July 1, 2013, an applicant for
licensing pursuant to this chapter shall possess the following minimum
qualifications:

(1) Journey worker electrician: To be eligible for
the journey worker electrician examination, an applicant shall be at least
eighteen years of age and shall provide satisfactory evidence of:

(A) Experience in residential or commercial
wiring of at least five years full-time or its equivalent, but not less than
ten thousand hours, in the trade under the supervision of a journey worker or
supervising electrician; and

(B) Satisfactory completion, accepted by a
University of Hawaii community college offering an appropriate program of
study, of two hundred forty hours of electrical academic coursework;

(2) Journey worker specialty electrician: To be
eligible for the journey worker specialty electrician examination, an applicant
shall be at least eighteen years of age and shall provide satisfactory evidence
of:

(A) Experience of at least three years
full-time or its equivalent, but not less than six thousand hours, in the trade
under the supervision of a journey worker electrician, supervising electrician,
journey worker specialty electrician, or supervising specialty electrician; and

(B) Satisfactory completion, accepted by a
University of Hawaii community college offering an appropriate program of
study, of one hundred twenty hours of electrical academic coursework;

(3) Supervising electrician: To be eligible for the
supervising electrician examination, an applicant shall have been registered
with the board as a journey worker electrician for at least a period of four
years or shall have equivalent experience in the trade;

(4) Supervising specialty electrician: To be eligible
for the supervising specialty electrician examination, an applicant shall have
been registered with the board as a journey worker specialty electrician for at
least a period of two years or shall have equivalent experience in the trade;

(5) Journey worker plumber: To be eligible for the
journey worker plumber examination, an applicant shall provide satisfactory
evidence of experience of at least five years' full-time or its equivalent, but
not less than ten thousand hours, as a journey worker's or master plumber's
helper;

(6) Master plumber: To be eligible for the master
plumber examination, an applicant shall have been registered with the board as
a journey worker plumber for at least two years or shall have equivalent
experience in the trade;

(7) Maintenance electrician: To be eligible for the
maintenance electrician examination, an applicant shall be not less than
eighteen years of age and shall provide satisfactory evidence of:

(A) At least one year of experience in
performing electrical maintenance work plus satisfactory completion, accepted
by a University of Hawaii community college offering an appropriate program of
study, of at least eighty hours of electrical academic coursework; or

(B) Two years of schooling in the electrical
trade with not less than one thousand hours of hands-on lab exercises;

(8) Journey worker industrial electrician: To be
eligible for the journey worker industrial electrician examination, an
applicant shall be at least eighteen years of age and shall provide
satisfactory evidence of:

(A) Experience in industrial electrical work
of at least four years full-time or its equivalent, but not less than eight
thousand hours; and

(B) Satisfactory completion, as accepted by a
University of Hawaii community college offering an appropriate program of
study, of two hundred hours of electrical academic coursework; and

(9) Supervising industrial electrician: To be
eligible for the supervising industrial electrician examination, an applicant
shall have been registered with the board as a journey worker industrial
electrician for a period of at least three years or shall have equivalent
experience in the trade. [L 1971, c 183, pt of §1; am L 1972, c 2, §20 and c
196, §3; am L 1982, c 205, §3; am L 1983, c 38, §1 and c 56, §4; am L 1991, c
117, §1; gen ch 1993; am L 2010, c 35, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next